Utah statutes.
16-16-516.   Action without a meeting.

(1)  Unless the organic rules require that action be taken only at a members meeting, any action that may be taken by the members may be taken without a meeting if each member entitled to vote on the action consents in a record to the action.

(2)  Consent under Subsection (1) may be withdrawn by a member in a record at any time before the limited cooperative association receives a consent from each member entitled to vote.

(3)  Consent to any action may specify the effective date or time of the action.

